Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 1

General Provisions

17-5-101. Intent of chapter.

The regulation of judicial conduct is critical to preserving the integrity of the judiciary and enhancing public confidence in the judicial system. This chapter is intended to provide an orderly and efficient method for making inquiry into the physical, mental, and moral fitness of any Tennessee judge; the judge's manner of performance of duty; and the judge's commission of any act that reflects unfavorably upon the judiciary of the state or brings the judiciary into disrepute or that may adversely affect the administration of justice in this state. This chapter further is intended to provide a process by which appropriate sanctions may be imposed.

Acts 2019, ch. 496, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The code of judicial conduct is compiled in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 10.

Former Title 17, Chapter 5, Part 1, §§17-5-101 —17-1-503, (Acts 1979, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., § 17-801; T.C.A., § 17-802; T.C.A., § 17-803; Acts 1983, ch. 17, § 1; Acts 1995, ch. 208, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 564, §§ 1-3; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 469, § 1, effective July 1, 2019), concerned general provisions of the board of judicial conduct.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 496, § 2. July 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 496, § 2 provided that for the purposes of vacating and reconstituting the board and appointing a new disciplinary counsel, the act shall take effect on May 24, 2019.

Cross-References. Impeachment of judges or chancellors, title 8, ch. 46.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Selection — The Tennessee Experience (N. Houston Parks), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 615.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 191.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of court of the judiciary, OAG 87-02 (1/7/87) (decided under former T.C.A. §17-5-101).

Civil causes of action against state trial judges, OAG 99-001 (1/19/99) (decided under former T.C.A. §17-5-101).

Collateral References.

Substitution of judge in state criminal trial. 45 A.L.R.5th 591.

17-5-102. Applicability of chapter.

This chapter applies to:

All Tennessee judges, including, but not limited to, appellate, trial, general sessions, probate, juvenile, and municipal judges, senior judges, claims commissioners, and all other judges sitting on or presiding over any court created by the general assembly or by the express or implied authority of the general assembly;

All persons for their conduct while sitting or presiding over any judicial proceeding, including, but not limited to, persons sitting by special appointment; and

Candidates for judicial office, as defined by the Code of Judicial Conduct, Rule 10 of the Rules of the Tennessee Supreme Court.

This chapter does not apply to administrative law judges.

This chapter regulates judicial behavior, not judicial decision-making.

Acts 2019, ch. 496, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 17, Chapter 5, Part 1, §§17-5-101 —17-1-503, (Acts 1979, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., § 17-801; T.C.A., § 17-802; T.C.A., § 17-803; Acts 1983, ch. 17, § 1; Acts 1995, ch. 208, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 564, §§ 1-3), concerned general provisions of the board of judicial conduct.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 496, § 2. July 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 496, § 2 provided that for the purposes of vacating and reconstituting the board and appointing a new disciplinary counsel, the act shall take effect on May 24, 2019.

17-5-103. Liberal construction of chapter.

This chapter must be liberally construed to accomplish the declared purposes and intents set forth in this chapter.

Acts 2019, ch. 496, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 17, Chapter 5, Part 1, §§17-5-101 —17-1-503, (Acts 1979, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., § 17-801; T.C.A., § 17-802; T.C.A., § 17-803; Acts 1983, ch. 17, § 1; Acts 1995, ch. 208, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 564, §§ 1-3), concerned general provisions of the board of judicial conduct.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 496, § 2. July 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 496, § 2 provided that for the purposes of vacating and reconstituting the board and appointing a new disciplinary counsel, the act shall take effect on May 24, 2019.